src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
! ============================ !
!! # Faroese Noun morphology 
! ============================ !

!! This file contains the inflection suffixes for the Faroese nowns
!! The infection classes are identical to the ones in *Føroysk orðabók*.

!! The morphology is ordered in three layers.

!    ---------------------------- !
!! # Layer 1: Basic noun lexica 
!    ---------------------------- !

!! The nominal morphology is added in three layers.
!! In this **first layer** we add gender tags and morphophonological
!! diacritics.
!! The next two layers are for indefinite and definite
!! suffixes, respectively.


!! ## Lexicons still to be allocated

!! We first list 4 lexica for words waiting to be checked.!
LEXICON xi 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** . TOOD: classify words in **xi**. They are all m
k1 ;
!!
LEXICON xkv2 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** . TOOD: classify xkv1. They are all f and end in a
kv2 ;
!!
LEXICON xh3 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**. TOOD: classify xkv2. They are all f and end in a consonant
h3 ;
!!
LEXICON xh25 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**. TOOD: classify xkv2. They are all f and end in a consonant
h25 ;

LEXICON f
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
kv0 ;

!! ## Irregular nouns

!! These are lexica with number 0, they have no inflectional morphology.!
LEXICON k0 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for januar etc.
 +N+Msc: irregular_nouns ;
!
LEXICON kv0 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for ommudidd
 +N+Fem: irregular_nouns ;
 !
LEXICON h0 ! A-fýra
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for indeclinable neuters
 +N+Neu: irregular_nouns ;
!
LEXICON irregular_nouns
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** just gives the tags for the indeclinables
 +Sg+Nom+Indef: ENDLEX ; ! januar
 +Sg+Acc+Indef: ENDLEX ; ! januar
 +Sg+Dat+Indef: ENDLEX ; ! januar
 +Sg+Gen+Indef: ENDLEX ; ! januar

LEXICON englishloans
 +Sg+Nom+Indef: ENDLEX ; ! januar
 +Sg+Acc+Indef: ENDLEX ; ! januar
 +Sg+Dat+Indef: ENDLEX ; ! januar
 +Sg+Gen+Indef: ENDLEX ; ! januar
 +Pl+Nom+Indef:%>s ENDLEX ; ! januar
 +Pl+Acc+Indef:%>s ENDLEX ; ! januar
 +Pl+Dat+Indef:%>s ENDLEX ; ! januar
 +Pl+Gen+Indef:%>s ENDLEX ; ! januar


!! ## Lexica for words belonging to two paradigms.
!! These are simply split (h11/12 to h11 and h12, etc).!
LEXICON h11/12 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h11 ;
  h12  ;
!
LEXICON h11/41 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h11 ;
  h41  ;
!
LEXICON h3/h41 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h3  ;
  h41 ;
!LEXICON h3/kv2
!  h3 ;
!  kv2 ;
!
LEXICON h4/41 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h4  ;
  h41  ;
!
LEXICON h7/h3 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h7  ;
  h3  ;
!
LEXICON k11/kv6 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k11 ;
  kv6 ; !
LEXICON k19/12 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k19 ;
  k12  ;
!
LEXICON k25/17f 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k25 ;
  k_flt17 ; 
!LEXICON k52/kv2 
!  k52 ;
!  kv2 ; !
LEXICON k9/10 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k9  ;
  k10  ;
!
LEXICON k9/16 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k9  ;
  k16  ;
!
LEXICON k1/3e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k1e ;
  k3e ;
!
LEXICON k1/3
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k1 ;
  k3 ;
!
LEXICON k1/4
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k1 ;
  k4 ;
!
LEXICON k1e/48f !k1e/f84b Heini
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k1e     ;
  k_flt48 ;
!
LEXICON k1e/h24e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 k1e ;
 h24e ;
!
LEXICON k1/11
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 k1 ;
 k11 ;
!
LEXICON k6/7
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
               k6          ;
               k7          ;
!
LEXICON k6/8
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
               k6          ;
               k8          ;
!
LEXICON k6e/19e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
               k6e         ;
               k19e        ;
!
LEXICON k7/6
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
               k7          ;
               k6          ;
!
LEXICON k8/17
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k8    ;
  k17   ;
!
LEXICON k8/6
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k8   ;
  k6   ;



!! ## The ordinary lexica

!! These lexica split into sg and pl lexica, and add +N and gender tags.
!! Thereafter it points to Layer 2, the case suffixes


!! ### Lexica for weak masculines.
!
LEXICON k1 ! risi
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** , risi, is the basic Msc lexicon, split in sg and pl
  k1e    ;
  k_flt1 ;
!
LEXICON k1e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc: W_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc: W_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc: W_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc: W_M_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON k_flt1
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc: W_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc: W_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc: W_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc: W_M_PLGEN ;
!
LEXICON k1_3stem  
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for 3-syllabic stams like *felagi*, mixed dative forms + UUML
 +N+Msc:       W_M_SGNOM       ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_SGACC       ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_SGDAT_mixed ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_SGGEN       ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_PLNOM       ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_PLACC       ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_PLDAT       ;
 +N+Msc:^UUML W_M_PLDAT       ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_PLGEN       ;
!
LEXICON k2 ! beiggi
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** beiggi
 +N+Msc:^JI W_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:     W_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc:     W_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc:     W_M_SGGEN ;
 +N+Msc:     W_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:     W_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:     W_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:     W_M_PLGEN ;
!
LEXICON k3 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  hagi
  k3e    ;
  k_flt3 ;
!
LEXICON k3e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc: W_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc: W_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc: W_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc: W_M_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON k_flt3
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:       W_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:^UUML W_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_PLGEN ;
!
LEXICON k4 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  tanki, just pointing to k3 (identical). Same u_umlaut, but nasal cns
  k3 ; ! !
LEXICON k5 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for bóndi
 +N+Msc:       W_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_SGGEN    ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML W_M_PLNOM_UR  ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:^IUML%>urnir MscObl_Flag ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML W_M_PLACC_UR  ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:^IUML%>urnar MscObl_Flag ;
 +N+Msc:       W_M_PLDAT    ; ! bóndum
 +N+Msc:r      W_M_PLDAT    ; ! bóndrum
 +N+Msc:       W_M_PLGEN    ;


!! ### Lexica for strong masculines

LEXICON k6_null 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  antikrist
  k6e_null ;
  k_flt6   ;
!
LEXICON k6e_null
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN      ;
!
LEXICON k6 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  úlvur
  k6e    ;
  k_flt6 ;
!
LEXICON k6e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON k_flt6
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;
!
LEXICON k7 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  sandur
  k7e    ;
  k_flt7 ;
!
LEXICON k7e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON k_flt7
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN ;
!
LEXICON k_flt8
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl, pointing to k_flt7
  k_flt7 ;
!
LEXICON k8e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg, pointing to k7e
  k7e   ;
!
LEXICON k8 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  garður, pointing to k7, but has a different u-umlaut
  k7 ; 
!
LEXICON k_flt9
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
  k_flt6 ;
!
LEXICON k9e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg, pointing to k6e
  k6e ;
!
LEXICON k9
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** with double consonant deletion in front of s, but pointing to k6
  k6 ;
! Roynd
!
LEXICON k9e_2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg, pointing to k6e, and pointing to l24 *iskur
  :%>kk k6e ;
  :%>sk p24 ;
  !
LEXICON k9_2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** with double consonant deletion in front of s, but pointing to k6, and pointing to l24 *iskur
  :%>kk k6  ;
  :%>sk p24 ;
!
LEXICON k10/11
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k10 ;
  k11 ;
!
LEXICON k10
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** splitting in sg/pl
  k10e    ;
  k_flt10 ;
