src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Shortnouns
hel+CmpNP/None:hel xkv2 ;
fit+CmpNP/None:fit xkv2 ;
not+CmpNP/None:not xkv2 ;
pló+CmpNP/None:pló xkv2 ;
vei+CmpNP/None:ve xh25 ;
jói+CmpNP/None:jó xi ;
LEXICON Nouns
ejektorur:ejektor k6 ;
boripallur:bori#pall k10 ;
skjúrtuknappur:skjúrtu#knapp k10 ;
annaðkvøld:annað#kvøld h0 ;
kapp:kapp h0 ;
juni:juni k0 ;
januar:januar k0 ;
novembur:novembur k0 ;
alin:alin kv0 ;
ommudidd:ommudidd kv0 ;
maskin:maskin kv0 ;
rumbuldós:rumbuldós kv0 ;
klubbi:klubb k1/11 ;
dilemma:dilemma h11/41 ;
stoff:stoff h11/41 ;
farvustoff:farvu#stoff h11/41 ;
koldepot:koldepot h11/41 ;
marked:marked h4/41 ;
studio:studio h4/41 ;
lasarett:lasarett h4/41 ;
maskingever:maskin#gever h3/h41 ;
gever:gever h3/h41 ;
tunnilsmunni:tunnilsmunn k1 ;
jakobinari:jakobinar k1 ;
munnpengar:munn#peng k_flt1 ;
dúnkarkar:dúnkark k_flt1 ;
slíðrar:slíðr k_flt1 ;
svágur:svág k19/12 ;
abbabeiggi:abbabeiggj k2 ;
fjaðraskíggi:fjaðraskíggj k2 ;
yrkisfelagi:yrkis#felag k1/3 ;
eygnabakki:eygna#bakk k1/3 ;
langhali:langhal k1/3 ;
ríkiskassi:ríkiskass k1/3 ;
krógvispæl:krógvi#spæl h7/h3 ;
gonguspæl:gongu#spæl h7/h3 ;
status:status h0 ;
hoyberatog:hoyberatog xh3 ;
koffein:koffein xh3 ;
gass:gass h11/12 ;
veðurlagsgass:veður#lags#gass h11/12 ;
vakstrarhúsgass:vakstrar#hús#gass h11/12 ;
jarðgass:jarð#gass h11/12 ;
harmljóð:harmljóð xh3 ;
ervahagi:ervahag k3 ;
summarhagi:summarhag k3 ;
undirkarði:undirkarð k3 ;
fínkarðar:fínkarð k_flt3 ;
blandingarkarðar:blandingarkarð k_flt3 ;
grovkarðar:grovkarð k_flt3 ;
fíandi:fíand k1/4 ;
strangi:strang k1/4 ;
áraplanki:áraplank k1/4 ;
hóreiggj:hóreiggj xh3 ;
skilatanki:skilatank k4 ;
baktanki:baktank k4 ;
fagnarbóndi:fagnarbónd k5 ;
óðalsbóndi:óðalsbónd k5 ;
uglubóndi:uglubónd k5 ;
bøkkur:bøkk k9/16 ;
veðurfrøðingur:veðurfrøðing k6 ;
kappróðabátur:kappróða#bát k6 ;
tøtlingar:tøtling k_flt6 ;
tøssingar:tøssing k_flt6 ;
skrúðsnórar:skrúðsnór k_flt6 ;
anbefalingur:anbefaling k11/kv6 ;
fínkambur:fínkamb k7 ;
mórenusandur:mórenusand k7 ;
lomvigagarður:lomvigagarð k8 ;
sólgarður:sólgarð k8 ;
leysapartar:leysapart k_flt8 ;
fínmekanikkur:fínmekani k9_2 ;
gymnastikkur:gymnasti k9_2 ;
ravnatollur:ravnatoll k9 ;
naglasoppur:naglasopp k9 ;
jarðarsokkar:jarðarsokk k_flt9 ;
hálvsokkar:hálvsokk k_flt9 ;
skáldkoppar:skáldkopp k_flt9 ;
fótmáli:fótmál k1e/h24e ;
salli:sall k1e ;
vevni:vevn k1e ;
trúni:trún k1e/h24e ;
góðtrúni:góð#trún k1e/h24e ;
hiti:hit k1e ;
darvi:darv k1e ;
veganari:veganar k1 ;
ódagi:ódag k1/3e ;
snjógvhagi:snjógvhag k3e ;
mistrúni:mis#trún k1e/h24e ;
frí:frí h0 ;
humanitetur:humanitet k6e ;
moralur:moral k8e ;
reggaemusikkur:reggaemusi k9e_2 ;
etikkur+CmpNP/First:eti k9e_2 ; ! -etikkur too similar to adj..
dialektikkur:dialekti k9e_2 ;
poppur:popp k9e ;
kjølur:kjøl k25/17f ;
hamari:hamar k1e/48f ;
klinkhamari:klinkhamar k1e/48f ;
skallhamari:skallhamar k1e/48f ;
gróthamari:gróthamar k1e/48f ;
Skagi:Skag k3e ;
kleggi:klegg k2 ;
kølitangi:køli#tang k1/4 ;
illtanki:ill#tank k4 ;
kult:kult k6_null ;
antikrist:antikrist k6_null ;
felagi:felag k1_3stem ;
búfelagi:búfelag k1_3stem ;
gullbrandur:gullbrand k7/6 ;
nykubrandur:nykubrand k7/6 ;
kolubrandur:kolubrand k7/6 ;
sjósandur:sjósand k7 ;
drangur:drang k7/6 ;
blakkur:blakk k9/10 ;
nekkur:nekk k9e ;
kjálkabøkkur:kjálkabøkk k9/16 ;
hvannabøkkur:hvannabøkk k9/16 ;
loynibøkkur:loynibøkk k9/16 ;
ryskur:rysk k6e ;
fjalladalur:fjalladal k8/17 ;
áardalur:áardal k8/17 ;
rivudalur:rivudal k8/17 ;
jallur:jall k10 ;
mjøllur:mjøll k9e ;
barmur:barm k8/6 ;
tarmur:tarm k6/8 ;
baktarmur:baktarm k6/8 ;
grunnur:grunn k9 ;
húgvuravnur:húgvuravn k6/8 ;
skjaldakampur:skjalda#kamp k6/7 ;
hanakampur:hana#kamp k6/7 ;
trøllakalskampur:trølla#kals#kamp k6/7 ;
svampur:svamp k6/7 ;
kassur:kass k10/11 ;
mókassur:mókass k10/11 ;
kellingarkjaftur:kellingar#kjaft k6/8 ;
svultur:svult k6e/19e ;
svøltur:svølt k6e/19e ;
frampartur:fram#part k8/6 ;
pústur:púst k6e/19e ;
nevapústur:neva#púst k6e/19e ;
náttskarvur:nátt#skarv k8/6 ;
geilargarður:geilar#garð k8 ;
borður:borð k6e ;
diabetes:diabetes k0 ;
hugsavning:hugsavning f ;
dupultsong:dupultsong f ;
greinan:greinan f ;
elektromagnet:elektromagnet f ;
hyperlink englishloans ;
homepage englishloans ;
